Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.390

Running start program—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the student achievement council shall jointly develop and adopt rules governing RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.380 and 28A.600.402, if rules are necessary. The rules shall be written to encourage the maximum use of the program and shall not narrow or limit the enrollment options under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.380.

[ 2023 c 350 s 3; 2012 c 229 s 506; 1994 c 205 s 10; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.